District of Columbia statutes.
1-632.03

Police officers and fire fighters appointed after the date this chapter becomes effective.

(a)

The following provisions shall not apply to police officers and fire fighters appointed after the date that this chapter becomes effective as provided in § 1-636.02:

(1)

(A)

Section 5-541.01, note;

(B)

Sections 5-101.02, 5-105.01(a), 5-133.03, 5-133.07, 5-123.01, 5-133.08, and 5-133.10;

(C)

Sections 5-127.03, 5-105.03, 5-133.09, 5-133.10, and 5-111.01;

(D)

Section 5-105.04;

(E)

Section 5-105.06;

(F)

Sections 5-105.07 and 5-403;

(G)

Section 5-133.04 [repealed];

(H)

Sections 5-111.03 and 5-406;

(I)

Section 5-410;

(J)

Sections 5-131.01 through 5-131.05;

(K)

Section 5-133.12;

(L)

Sections 5-402(a), 5-404, and 5-407;

(M)

Section 5-405;

(N)

Section 5-408;

(O)

Section 5-409;

(P)

Section 5-701 et seq.;

(Q)

Sections 5-1001 through 5-1003;

(R)

Section 5-901 et seq.;

(S)

Section 5-542.01 et seq.;

(T)

Section 5-501.01;

(U)

Sections 5-521.01, 5-521.02, and 5-521.03 insofar as it affects police officers and firefighters employed by the District of Columbia;

(V)

Section 5-521.02;

(W)

Sections 5-1302 and 5-1303;

(X)

Section 5-1304 insofar as it affects police officers and firefighters employed by the District of Columbia;

(Y)

Section 5-1305;

(Z)

Sections 5-105.05, 5-127.01, and 5-133.06;

(AA)

Section 5-133.02;

(BB)

Sections 5-131.02, 5-131.03, and 5-131.04; and

(CC)

Section 5-127.02.

(2)

(A)

Reorganization Order 39, June 18, 1953, as amended (relating to fire trial boards); and

(B)

Reorganization Order 48, June 26, 1953, as amended (relating to police trial and review boards).

(b)

Notwithstanding subsections (a) or (c) of this section, no provision of law affecting the United States Park Police, United States Secret Service Uniformed Division or Secret Service shall be deemed to be affected.

(c)

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a)(1)(B) of this section, or of any other law or regulation, for members of the Metropolitan Police Department, the Assistant Chiefs of Police, Deputy Chiefs of Police, and inspectors shall be selected from among the lieutenants and captains of the force and shall be returned to the same civil service rank when the Mayor so determines as provided in § 5-105.01.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3203, 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-203, § 2(f), 36 DCR 450
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 822(b), 47 DCR 6308
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 104(b), 51 DCR 9406
Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-173, § 201(b), 61 DCR 12582

Application of Titles I and VI of D.C. Law 15-194: Section 1301 of D.C. Law 15-194 provided: “Titles I and VI of this act shall apply to pre-1980 employees of the Metropolitan Police Department and the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department upon their enactment by Congress.”

Section 203 of D.C. Law 20-173 provided that the amendments by §§ 201 and 202 of the act shall expire 2 years after March 7, 2015.

Section 5-133.07, referenced in (1)(B), was repealed by D.C. Law 9-145, § 302(a), 39 DCR 4895, effective Sept. 10, 1992.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(b) of the Metropolitan Police Department Commencement of Discipline and Command Staff Appointment Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-524, Dec. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 13112, 20 STAT 4438).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 822(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 822(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-173 substituted “the Assistant Chiefs of Police, Deputy Chiefs of Police, and inspectors shall be selected from among the lieutenants and captains of the force and shall be returned to the same civil service rank when the Mayor so determines” for “the Assistant and Deputy Chiefs of Police and inspectors shall be selected from among the captains of the force and shall be returned to the rank of captain when the Mayor so determines” in (c).
D.C. Law 15-194, in subsec. (a), substituted “5-105.01(a),” for “5-105.01,” in subpar. (B) of par. (1), and substituted “5-402(a),” for “5-402,” in subpar. (L) of par. (1).
D.C. Law 13-172 added subsec. (c).
1973 Ed., § 1-362.3.
1981 Ed., § 1-633.3.
This section is referenced in § 1-608.01 and § 1-636.02.